Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8302
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Discount Medical Plan Organization Act is to promote the public interest by establishing standards for discount medical plan organizations to protect consumers from unfair or deceptive marketing, sales, or enrollment practices and to facilitate consumer understanding of the role and function of discount medical plan organizations in providing access to medical or ancillary services.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 34.